Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6137.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center community benefit agreement act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission created in section 1 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1. (b) "Community benefit agreement" means 1 or more binding legal agreements between the owner or operator of a data center and a local unit of government, a utility provider, or other community stakeholders under which the owner or operator agrees to pay for or provide certain resources to accommodate and benefit local community interests. (c) "Data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. (d) "Local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village. (e) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Sec. 5. (1) A person shall not begin construction or operation of a data center unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The local unit of government approves the community benefit agreement for the data center under subsection (2). (b) The commission approves the community benefit agreement for the data center under subsection (3). (c) The owner or operator of the data center enters into the community benefit agreements approved under subsections (2) and (3). (2) In order to obtain approval for a community benefit agreement under this section, the owner or operator of a data center must file an application for review with the local unit of government for the geographic area in which the data center is located. The application must be on a form prescribed by the local unit of government. Not later than 90 days after receiving an application for review under this subsection, the local unit of government shall approve or deny the application. The local unit of government shall not approve the community benefit agreement unless the local unit of government determines that all of the following conditions are met: (a) The parties to the community benefit agreement include, but are not limited to, the owner or operator of the data center and the local unit of government or an agency or instrumentality of the local unit of government. (b) The community benefit agreement will accommodate and benefit the public health, safety, and general welfare of the inhabitants and the lands and resources of the local unit of government. (c) The community benefit agreement meets the requirements of subsection (4). (3) In order to obtain approval for a community benefit agreement under this section, the owner or operator of a data center must file an application for review with the commission. The application must be on a form prescribed by the commission. Not later than 90 days after receiving an application for review under this subsection, the commission shall approve or deny the application. The commission shall not approve the community benefit agreement unless the commission determines that all of the following conditions are met: (a) The parties to the community benefit agreement include, but are not limited to, the owner or operator of the data center and a utility provider for the data center or an agency or instrumentality of the utility provider. (b) The community benefit agreement will accommodate and benefit the interests of other ratepayers of the utility provider in the geographic area in which the data center is located. (c) The community benefit agreement meets the requirements of subsection (4). (4) A community benefit agreement entered into under this section must meet all of the following requirements: (a) The community benefit agreement addresses not less than 50% of the following topics: (i) Hiring of local workers and contractors for the data center. (ii) Water usage for the data center. (iii) Cost allocation of any electrical or water infrastructure upgrades that would be required to supply the data center. (iv) Funding for community investment and improvement projects. (v) Home efficiency improvements. (b) The community benefit agreement specifies that it is enforceable against each owner and operator of the data center. Sec. 7. A local unit of government shall not issue, grant, or approve a site plan, permit, land use or activity, variance, easement, certificate, or other authorization for a data center unless the local unit of government has approved a community benefit agreement for the data center in accordance with section 5. Sec. 9. The commission shall not approve a utility interconnection for a data center unless the local unit of government has approved a community benefit agreement for the data center in accordance with section 5. Sec. 11. The commission may promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06933'26) or House Bill No. 6135 (request no. H06933'26). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06934'26) or House Bill No. 6139 (request no. H06934'26). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06939'26 a) or House Bill No. 6136 (request no. H06939'26 a). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06942'26) or House Bill No. 6140 (request no. H06942'26). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06943'26) or House Bill No. 6142 (request no. H06943'26). (f) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06965'26) or House Bill No. 6138 (request no. H06965'26). (g) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S07181'26) or House Bill No. 6141 (request no. H07181'26).